Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-388
Collection of taxes and fees required.

No county treasurer shall receive or accept an application
or registration fee or issue any registration certificate for any motor vehicle
or trailer without collection of the taxes and the fees imposed in sections
60-3,185, 60-3,190, and 77-2703 and any other applicable taxes and fees upon
such motor vehicle or trailer. If applicable, the applicant shall furnish
proof of payment, in the form prescribed by the director as directed by the
United States Secretary of the Treasury, of the federal heavy vehicle use
tax imposed by the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 4481.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 88;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 59.

Cited in connection with separate listing and assessing of motor vehicles. Peterson v. Hancock, 166 Neb. 637, 90 N.W.2d 298 (1958).